District of Columbia statutes.
6-751.08

Other applicable standards.

Any person who installs a smoke detector shall comply with the requirements of this subchapter and the National Fire Protection Association Standards 72-E and 74 (1974 Edition). In the event of a conflict between this subchapter and the National Fire Protection Association Standards 72-E and 74 (1974 Edition), this subchapter takes precedence.

June 20, 1978, D.C. Law 2-81, § 9, 24 DCR 9050
1981 Ed., § 5-536.
1973 Ed., § 5-335.